Maryland, session 2025, HB1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 3–903.1 and 3–904 through 3–909 of Article – Labor and Employment of
the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 3–903, 3–910,
3–911, 3–913 through 3–915, and 3–917 through 3–920 of Article – Labor and Employment
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 3–904, 3–912, 3–913,
3–915 through 3–917, and 3–918 through 3–921, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Claim” means a request or demand, under a contract or otherwise, for
money or other property, whether or not the governmental entity has title to the money or
property, that is:
(i) presented to an officer, employee, or agent of a governmental
entity; or
(ii) made to a contractor, a grantee, or another recipient, if the
money or other property is to be spent or used on a governmental entity’s behalf or to
advance an interest of a governmental entity, and the governmental entity:
1. provides or has provided any portion of the money or other
property requested or demanded; or
2. will reimburse the contractor, grantee, or other recipient
for any portion of the money or other property that is requested or demanded.

HOUSE BILL 1096
(2) “Claim” does not include requests or demands for money or other
property MADE BY AN INDIVIDUAL BENEFICIARY that a governmental entity has paid to
[an] THE individual as compensation for employment or as an income subsidy with no
restrictions on that individual’s use of the money or other property.
8–102.
(a) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(9) OF THIS SECTION,
THIS section does not apply to claims, records, or statements related to State or local taxes.
(b) A person may not:
(8) knowingly conceal, or knowingly and improperly avoid or decrease, an
obligation to pay or transmit money or other property to a governmental entity, including
misrepresenting the time at which a trade was made to make the transaction appear less
favorable; [or]
(9) KNOWINGLY MAKE, USE, OR CAUSE TO BE MADE OR USED A FALSE
RECORD OR STATEMENT RESULTING IN:
(I) THE UNDERPAYMENT OF CONTRIBUTIONS OWED TO THE
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE FUND; OR
(II) THE PAYMENT OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFITS
OF MORE THAN $15,000 IN A CALENDAR YEAR; OR
[(9)] (10) knowingly make any other false or fraudulent claim against a
governmental entity.
(c) (1) A person that is found to have violated subsection (b) of this section is
liable to the governmental entity for:
(i) a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation; and
(ii) an additional amount of not more than three times the amount
of damages that the governmental entity sustains as a result of the acts of that person in
violation of subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The total amount owed by a person under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may not be less than the amount of the actual damages the governmental entity
incurs as a result of the person’s violation of subsection (b) of this section.
8–109.

HOUSE BILL 1096 5
(c) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State under this
title into the General Fund of the State.
(2) (i) If a violation of this title affects any of the following funds, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State under this
title into the affected fund:
1. a fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article;
2. a special fund requiring the reversion of appropriated
funds to the special fund under § 7–304 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
3. a fund under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees for
the State Retirement and Pension System; [or]
4. a fund under the jurisdiction of the State Employee and
Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program; OR
5. THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE FUND.
(ii) If more than one fund is affected by a violation of this title, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State into the
appropriate fund or the General Fund of the State on a pro rata basis.
(III) IF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE INVOLVES THE FAILURE TO
PAY PREVAILING WAGE RATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, CIVIL PENALTIES AND DAMAGES
COLLECTED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL BE USED TO PAY RESTITUTION DIRECTLY TO
AFFECTED WORKERS.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “ATTORNEY GENERAL” MEANS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF
MARYLAND, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE.
(C) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor and Industry, OR THE
COMMISSIONER’S AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE.
[(c)] (D) (1) “Employ” means to engage an individual to work.

HOUSE BILL 1096
(2) “Employ” includes:
(i) allowing an individual to work; and
(ii) instructing an individual to be present at a work site.
3–427.
(a) (1) If an employer pays an employee less than the wage required under this
subtitle, the employee may bring an action against the employer to recover:
[(1)] (I) the difference between the wage paid to the employee and the
wage required under this subtitle;
[(2)] (II) an additional amount equal to the difference between the wage
paid to the employee and the wage required under this subtitle as liquidated damages; and
[(3)] (III) counsel fees and other costs.
[(b)] (2) On the written request of an employee who is entitled to bring an action
under this section, the Commissioner may:
[(1)] (I) take an assignment of the claim in trust for the employee;
[(2)] (II) ask the Attorney General to bring an action in accordance with
this section on behalf of the employee; and
[(3)] (III) consolidate [2] TWO or more claims against an employer.
(3) (I) IF A COURT DETERMINES THAT AN EMPLOYEE IS ENTITLED
TO RECOVERY IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL AWARD TO
THE EMPLOYEE:
1. THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE WAGE PAID TO THE
EMPLOYEE AND THE WAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN ADDITIONAL AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE
WAGE PAID TO THE EMPLOYEE AND THE WAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AS
LIQUIDATED DAMAGES; AND
3. REASONABLE COUNSEL FEES AND OTHER COSTS.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYER SHOWS TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE
COURT THAT THE EMPLOYER ACTED IN GOOD FAITH AND REASONABLY BELIEVED

HOUSE BILL 1096 7
THAT THE WAGES PAID TO THE EMPLOYEE WERE NOT LESS THAN THE WAGE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL:
1. DETERMINE THAT LIQUIDATED DAMAGES SHOULD
NOT BE AWARDED; OR
2. AWARD AS LIQUIDATED DAMAGES ANY AMOUNT LESS
THAN THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST AN
EMPLOYER ON BEHALF OF AN EMPLOYEE IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYER PAYS 10 OR MORE EMPLOYEES LESS THAN
THE WAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF WAGES UNDERPAID FOR ALL
AFFECTED EMPLOYEES IS $25,000 OR GREATER.
(2) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY RECOVER:
(I) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE WAGES PAID TO THE
EMPLOYEES AND THE WAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) AN ADDITIONAL AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE DIFFERENCE
BETWEEN THE WAGES PAID TO THE EMPLOYEES AND THE WAGE REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE AS LIQUIDATED DAMAGES;
(III) A CIVIL PENALTY OF $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION PAYABLE
INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE;
(IV) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND OTHER COSTS
PAYABLE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
(V) ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
(3) BEFORE INITIATING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION.
(c) The agreement of an employee to work for less than the wage to which the
employee is entitled under this subtitle is not a defense to an action under this section.
[(d) (1) If a court determines that an employee is entitled to recovery in an
action under this section, the court shall award to the employee:

HOUSE BILL 1096
(i) the difference between the wage paid to the employee and the
wage required under this subtitle;
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an
additional amount equal to the difference between the wage paid to the employee and the
wage required under this subtitle as liquidated damages; and
(iii) reasonable counsel fees and other costs.
(2) If an employer shows to the satisfaction of the court that the employer
acted in good faith and reasonably believed that the wages paid to the employee were not
less than the wage required under this subtitle, the court shall:
(i) determine that liquidated damages should not be awarded; or
(ii) award, as liquidated damages, any amount less than the amount
specified in paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.]
3–507.2.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any remedy available under § 3–507 of this subtitle[,]:
(I) if an employer fails to pay an employee in accordance with §
3–502 or § 3–505 of this subtitle, after 2 weeks have elapsed from the date on which the
employer is required to have paid the wages, the employee may bring an action against the
employer to recover the unpaid wages; OR
(II) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION ON
BEHALF OF EMPLOYEES TO RECOVER UNPAID WAGES IF, AFTER 2 WEEKS HAVE
ELAPSED FROM THE DATE ON WHICH AN EMPLOYER IS REQUIRED TO HAVE PAID THE
WAGES:
1. THE EMPLOYER FAILS TO PAY 10 OR MORE
EMPLOYEES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–502 OR § 3–505 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–502 OR § 3–505 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF UNPAID WAGES FOR ALL AFFECTED EMPLOYEES
IS $25,000 OR GREATER.
(2) BEFORE BRINGING AN ACTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1006 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1096 9
(b) If, in an action under subsection (a) of this section, a court finds that an
employer withheld the wage of an employee in violation of this subtitle and not as a result
of a bona fide dispute, the court may award the employee an amount not exceeding 3 times
the wage, and reasonable counsel fees and other costs.
(c) (1) (I) In this subsection[, “construction services” has the meaning
stated in § 3–901 of this title] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(II) “CONSTRUCTION SERVICES” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
SERVICES PROVIDED IN CONNECTION WITH REAL PROPERTY:
1. BUILDING;
2. RECONSTRUCTING;
3. IMPROVING;
4. ENLARGING;
5. PAINTING;
6. ALTERING;
7. MAINTAINING; AND
8. REPAIRING.
(III) “GENERAL CONTRACTOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–901 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) In an action brought under subsection (a) of this section, a general
contractor on a project for construction services is jointly and severally liable for a violation
of this subtitle that is committed by a subcontractor, regardless of whether the
subcontractor is in a direct contractual relationship with the general contractor.
(3) A subcontractor shall indemnify a general contractor for any wages,
damages, interest, penalties, or attorney’s fees owed as a result of the subcontractor’s
violation unless:
(i) indemnification is provided for in a contract between the general
contractor and the subcontractor; or

HOUSE BILL 1096
(ii) a violation of the subtitle arose due to a lack of prompt payment
in accordance with the terms of the contract between the general contractor and the
subcontractor.
3–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(b) “Construction services” includes the following services provided in connection
with real property:
(1) building;
(2) reconstructing;
(3) improving;
(4) enlarging;
(5) painting;
(6) altering;
(7) maintaining; and
(8) repairing.]
(B) (1) “ECONOMIC DAMAGES” MEANS A FINANCIAL LOSS INCURRED BY
AN EMPLOYEE AS A RESULT OF BEING MISCLASSIFIED BY AN EMPLOYER IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) “ECONOMIC DAMAGES” INCLUDES:
(I) UNPAID WAGES;
(II) LOST BENEFITS; AND
(III) REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES THAT, BY AGREEMENT OR
PRACTICE, THE EMPLOYER PAID TO WORKERS CLASSIFIED AS EMPLOYEES.
(C) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) PERFORMS WORK FOR REMUNERATION PAID BY A PERSON; AND

HOUSE BILL 1096 11
(2) IS ENTITLED TO ALL THE RIGHTS AND PROTECTIONS AFFORDED
TO EMPLOYEES UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, INCLUDING WAGE AND HOUR
LAWS, ANTIDISCRIMINATION LAWS, AND, AS APPLICABLE, WORKERS’
COMPENSATION AND UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFITS.
[(c)] (D) “Employer” means any person, OR A SUCCESSOR OF THE PERSON,
that employs an [individual] EMPLOYEE in the State.
[(d) “Exempt person” means an individual who:
(1) performs services in a personal capacity and employs no individuals
other than:
(i) a spouse of the exempt person;
(ii) children of the exempt person; or
(iii) parents of the exempt person;
(2) performs services free from direction and control over the means and
manner of providing the services, subject only to the right of the person or entity for whom
services are provided to specify the desired result;
(3) furnishes the tools and equipment necessary to provide the service;
(4) operates a business that is considered inseparable from the individual
for purposes of taxes, profits, and liabilities:
(i) in which the individual:
1. owns all of the assets and profits of the business; and
2. has sole, unlimited, personal liability for all of the debts
and liabilities of the business, unless the business is organized as a single–owned corporate
entity, to which sole, unlimited personal liability does not apply; and
(ii) for which:
1. the individual does not pay taxes for the business
separately but reports business income and losses on the individual’s personal tax return;
and
2. if the business is organized as a corporate entity and the
individual otherwise qualifies as an exempt person under this subsection, the individual
files a separate federal informational tax return for the entity as required by law;

HOUSE BILL 1096
(5) exercises complete control over the management and operations of the
business; and
(6) exercises the right and opportunity on a continuing basis to perform the
services of the business for multiple entities at the individual’s sole choice and discretion.]
(E) “GENERAL CONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENTERS INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH AN OWNER TO OVERSEE AND COORDINATE THE ENTIRE SCOPE OF
A PROJECT, INCLUDING ENSURING THAT THE WORK MEETS THE TERMS OF THE
AGREEMENT.
(F) “HIGHER–TIERED CONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENTERS INTO
AN AGREEMENT WITH A GENERAL CONTRACTOR TO PERFORM SERVICES ON A
PROJECT AND WHO SUBCONTRACTS ANY PORTION OF THE WORK TO ANOTHER
PERSON.
[(e)] (G) “Knowingly” means having actual knowledge[,] OF OR deliberate
[ignorance, or reckless] disregard for the [truth] REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(f) “Landscaping services” includes the following services:
(1) garden maintenance and planting;
(2) lawn care including fertilizing, mowing, mulching, seeding, and
spraying;
(3) seeding and mowing of highway strips;
(4) sod laying;
(5) turf installation, except artificial;
(6) ornamental bush planting, pruning, bracing, spraying, and removal;
and
(7) ornamental tree planting, pruning, bracing, spraying, and removal.
(g) (1) “Place of business” means the office or headquarters of the employer.
(2) “Place of business” does not include a work site at which the employer
has been contracted to perform services.]
(h) “Public body” means:
(1) the State;

HOUSE BILL 1096 13
(2) a unit of State government or an instrumentality of the State; or
(3) any political subdivision, agency, person, or entity that is a party to a
contract for which 50% or more of the money used is State money.
(I) “SUBCONTRACTOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENTERS INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH A GENERAL CONTRACTOR OR HIGHER–TIERED CONTRACTOR TO
PERFORM A SPECIFIC PORTION OF WORK OR SERVICES AS PART OF A LARGER
PROJECT OR CONTRACT.
(J) “SUCCESSOR” MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT:
(1) ACQUIRES, THROUGH ANY FORM OF TRANSACTION, THE BUSINESS
OPERATIONS, ASSETS, WORKFORCE, OR OTHER SIGNIFICANT ELEMENTS OF
ANOTHER EMPLOYER; AND
(2) CONTINUES TO OPERATE THE BUSINESS IN ESSENTIALLY THE
SAME MANNER AS THE PREVIOUS EMPLOYER.
(K) (1) “WORKER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING SERVICES FOR
REMUNERATION.
(2) “WORKER” INCLUDES EMPLOYEES AND INDIVIDUALS CLASSIFIED
OR ALLEGED TO BE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS, REGARDLESS OF THE LEGAL
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
3–902.
This subtitle applies [only] to [the following industries] ALL:
(1) [construction services] INDUSTRIES AND SECTORS WITHIN THE
STATE; and
(2) [landscaping services] EMPLOYERS, GENERAL CONTRACTORS,
HIGHER–TIERED CONTRACTORS, SUBCONTRACTORS, AND OTHER PERSONS
ENGAGING WORKERS IN THE STATE.
3–903.
(A) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A GENERAL CONTRACTOR
SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE AN EMPLOYER OF A WORKER WHO A HIGHER–TIERED
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AS AN
EMPLOYEE ON A PROJECT OVER WHICH THE GENERAL CONTRACTOR HAS

HOUSE BILL 1096
RESPONSIBILITY FOR OVERSIGHT AND COORDINATION, INCLUDING ENSURING THAT
THE WORK MEETS THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO AFFECT THE EMPLOYER STATUS OF THE HIGHER–TIERED CONTRACTOR OR
SUBCONTRACTOR WITH RESPECT TO THE MISCLASSIFIED EMPLOYEE.
(B) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A HIGHER–TIERED
CONTRACTOR SHALL BE CONSIDERED AN EMPLOYER OF A WORKER WHO A
SUBCONTRACTOR OF THE HIGHER–TIERED CONTRACTOR HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY
CLASSIFY AS AN EMPLOYEE.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO AFFECT THE EMPLOYER STATUS OF THE SUBCONTRACTOR WITH RESPECT TO
THE MISCLASSIFIED EMPLOYEE.
3–904.
(a) An employer may not fail to properly classify an individual who performs work
for remuneration paid by the employer.
(b) An employer has failed to properly classify an individual when an
employer–employee relationship exists as determined under subsection (c) of this section
but the employer has not classified the individual as an employee.
[(c) (1) Except as provided in § 3–903.1 of this subtitle, for purposes of
enforcement of this subtitle only, work performed by an individual for remuneration paid
by an employer shall be presumed to create an employer–employee relationship, unless:
(i) the individual is an exempt person; or
(ii) an employer demonstrates that:
1. the individual who performs the work is free from control
and direction over its performance both in fact and under the contract;
2. the individual customarily is engaged in an independent
business or occupation of the same nature as that involved in the work; and
3. the work is:
A. outside of the usual course of business of the person for
whom the work is performed; or
B. performed outside of any place of business of the person
for whom the work is performed.

HOUSE BILL 1096 15
(2) Work is outside of the usual course of business of the person for whom
it is performed under paragraph (1) of this subsection if:
(i) the individual performs the work off the employer’s premises;
(ii) the individual performs work that is not integrated into the
employer’s operation; or
(iii) the work performed is unrelated to the employer’s business.
(3) By contract, an employer may engage another business entity, which
may have its own employees, to do the same type of work in which the employer engages,
at the same location where the employer is working, without establishing an
employer–employee relationship between the two contracting entities.]
(C) (1) AN EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONSHIP IS PRESUMED TO EXIST
WHEN WORK IS PERFORMED BY A WORKER FOR REMUNERATION PAID BY A PERSON,
UNLESS THE PERSON PROVIDING THE REMUNERATION DEMONSTRATES THAT:
(I) THE WORKER IS FREE FROM CONTROL AND DIRECTION
OVER THE PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES, SUBJECT ONLY TO THE RIGHT OF THE
PERSON FOR WHICH SERVICES ARE PROVIDED TO SPECIFY THE DESIRED RESULT,
BOTH IN FACT AND UNDER THE CONTRACT;
(II) THE WORKER CUSTOMARILY IS ENGAGED IN AN
INDEPENDENTLY ESTABLISHED TRADE, OCCUPATION, PROFESSION, OR BUSINESS
THAT IS OF THE SAME NATURE AS THAT INVOLVED IN THE WORK BEING PERFORMED
BY THE WORKER FOR THE PERSON; AND
(III) THE WORK IS:
1. OUTSIDE THE USUAL COURSE OF BUSINESS OF THE
PERSON FOR WHICH THE WORK IS PERFORMED; OR
2. PERFORMED OUTSIDE ANY PLACE OF BUSINESS OF
THE PERSON FOR WHICH THE WORK IS PERFORMED.
(2) WORK IS OUTSIDE THE USUAL COURSE OF BUSINESS OF THE
PERSON FOR WHICH IT IS PERFORMED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III)1 OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL PERFORMS THE WORK OFF THE
EMPLOYER’S PREMISES;

HOUSE BILL 1096
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL PERFORMS WORK THAT IS NOT
INTEGRATED INTO THE EMPLOYER’S OPERATION; OR
(III) THE WORK PERFORMED IS UNRELATED TO THE
EMPLOYER’S BUSINESS.
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY ENGAGE BY CONTRACT ANOTHER BUSINESS
ENTITY, WHICH MAY HAVE ITS OWN EMPLOYEES, TO DO THE SAME TYPE OF WORK IN
WHICH THE EMPLOYER ENGAGES AT THE SAME LOCATION WHERE THE EMPLOYER
IS WORKING WITHOUT ESTABLISHING AN EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONSHIP
BETWEEN THE TWO CONTRACTING ENTITIES.
(d) The Commissioner shall adopt regulations to explain further and provide
specific examples of the application of subsection (c) of this section.
3–905.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE WAIVED OR SET ASIDE BY PRIVATE
AGREEMENT.
(B) AN AGREEMENT MADE BETWEEN AN EMPLOYER AND EMPLOYEE IN
WHICH THE EMPLOYEE AGREES TO BE CLASSIFIED AS AN INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR IS NOT A DEFENSE TO A CITATION OR IN A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
3–906.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER, ON THE COMMISSIONER’S OWN INITIATIVE OR ON
RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT, SHALL INVESTIGATE TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IN CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY:
(I) ENTER AND INSPECT A PERSON’S PLACE OF BUSINESS OR
PLACE OF WORK TO:
1. OBSERVE WORK BEING PERFORMED; AND
2. EXAMINE AND COPY:
A. RECORDS THAT THE PERSON IS REQUIRED TO KEEP IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1096 17
B. BOOKS, REGISTERS, PAYROLL RECORDS, RECORDS OF
WAGE WITHHOLDINGS, RECORDS OF WORK ACTIVITY AND HOURS OF WORK, AND
RECORDS OR INDICIA OF THE EMPLOYMENT STATUS OF WORKERS PERFORMING
WORK FOR THE PERSON; AND
C. ANY OTHER RECORDS RELATING TO COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) REQUIRE A PERSON TO PRODUCE WITHIN 15 CALENDAR
DAYS A TRUE AND CORRECT COPY OF AN ITEM DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH;
(III) DETERMINE THE IDENTITY AND ACTIVITIES OF A WORKER
RECEIVING REMUNERATION FROM THE PERSON; OR
(IV) CONDUCT CONFIDENTIAL INTERVIEWS AND OBTAIN ORAL
OR WRITTEN STATEMENTS FROM A WORKER RELATING TO INFORMATION
CONCERNING THE REMUNERATION OF WORKERS AND THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF
THE SERVICES PERFORMED.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER MAY CONDUCT THE ACTIVITIES DESCRIBED
IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT:
(I) A LOCATION WHERE WORKERS ARE ENGAGED TO PERFORM
WORK FOR THE PERSON; AND
(II) ANY OTHER LOCATION WHERE THE ITEMS DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE MAINTAINED BY THE PERSON OR AN
AGENT OF THE PERSON.
3–907.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE COMMISSIONER
IS DENIED ACCESS TO A PLACE OF BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK AFTER MAKING A
PROPER REQUEST TO THE OWNER, LESSEE, EMPLOYER, OR OTHER PERSON IN
CHARGE OF ACCESS TO THE PLACE OF BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY APPLY TO THE DISTRICT COURT FOR AN ADMINISTRATIVE
SEARCH WARRANT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) EACH APPLICATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1096
(1) STATE THE NATURE, PURPOSE, AND SCOPE OF THE INSPECTION;
AND
(2) SHOW THAT:
(I) THE APPLICANT IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO INSPECT THE
PLACE OF BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK TO WHICH ACCESS WAS DENIED;
(II) THE APPLICANT REQUESTED ACCESS AT A REASONABLE
TIME AND THE ACCESS WAS DENIED; AND
(III) THE INSPECTION IS FOR A PURPOSE RELATED TO THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER MAY NOT SUBMIT AN APPLICATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS THE SUBMISSION IS APPROVED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) ON A SHOWING OF PROBABLE CAUSE, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
ISSUE THE ADMINISTRATIVE SEARCH WARRANT AUTHORIZING THE COMMISSIONER
OR AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE TO ENTER AND INSPECT THE PLACE OF
BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK, EXAMINE AND COPY RECORDS, AND TAKE OTHER
NECESSARY ACTIONS TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
3–908.
(A) IN ENFORCING THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER MAY:
(1) ADMINISTER OATHS AND QUESTION WITNESSES ON RECORD AND
UNDER OATH; AND
(2) ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR:
(I) THE PRODUCTION OF A PERSON’S BOOKS, DOCUMENTS,
PAPERS, AND RECORDS; AND
(II) THE ATTENDANCE OF A WITNESS TO TESTIFY.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF A PERSON FAILS TO
COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION OR
FAILS TO TESTIFY ON A MATTER ON WHICH THE PERSON MAY LAWFULLY BE
INTERROGATED, ON A COMPLAINT FILED BY THE COMMISSIONER, THE CIRCUIT
COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PERSON RESIDES OR IS PRESENT MAY PASS

HOUSE BILL 1096 19
AN ORDER DIRECTING COMPLIANCE WITH THE SUBPOENA OR COMPELLING
TESTIMONY.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER MAY NOT FILE A COMPLAINT TO ENFORCE A
SUBPOENA UNLESS THE FILING IS APPROVED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT BE EXCUSED, ON THE GROUNDS THAT THE
TESTIMONY OR EVIDENCE MAY INCRIMINATE THE PERSON OR SUBJECT THE PERSON
TO A PENALTY OR FORFEITURE, FROM:
(I) ATTENDING AND TESTIFYING AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION; OR
(II) PRODUCING ANY DOCUMENT OR RECORD BEFORE THE
COMMISSIONER OR IN A PROCEEDING INITIATED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) EXCEPT IN CASES OF PERJURY OR CONTEMPT DURING
TESTIMONY, TESTIMONY AND EVIDENCE GIVEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
MAY NOT BE USED TO CRIMINALLY PROSECUTE AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE SPECIFIC
SUBJECT THE INDIVIDUAL WAS COMPELLED TO TESTIFY OR PRODUCE EVIDENCE
ABOUT.
3–909.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EMPLOYER THAT FAILS TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN EMPLOYEE SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT LESS THAN $5,000 AND NOT MORE THAN $10,000 FOR
EACH EMPLOYEE NOT PROPERLY CLASSIFIED.
(B) AN EMPLOYER THAT KNOWINGLY FAILS TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN
EMPLOYEE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT LESS THAN $10,000 AND
NOT MORE THAN $25,000 FOR EACH EMPLOYEE NOT PROPERLY CLASSIFIED.
(C) A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS SUBTITLE AND IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY OF $5,000 PER OCCURRENCE IF THE PERSON:
(1) HINDERS OR DELAYS THE COMMISSIONER’S INVESTIGATION
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) REFUSES TO ADMIT, AT REASONABLE TIMES, THE COMMISSIONER
TO A PLACE OF BUSINESS OR WORK;

HOUSE BILL 1096
(3) FAILS TO GIVE INFORMATION LAWFULLY REQUIRED FOR THE
PROPER ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON DEMAND OF THE COMMISSIONER;
(4) FAILS OR REFUSES TO MAKE RECORDS RELATING TO WORKERS
ACCESSIBLE TO THE COMMISSIONER; OR
(5) FALSIFIES RECORDS RELATING TO WORKERS.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF A PENALTY
FOR MISCLASSIFICATION OF EMPLOYEES BASED ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF MISCLASSIFIED EMPLOYEES;
(2) THE DURATION OF THE MISCLASSIFICATION;
(3) THE SEVERITY OF THE VIOLATION;
(4) THE IMPACT ON THE AFFECTED EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING UNPAID
WAGES, BENEFITS, AND TAXES; AND
(5) WHETHER THE EMPLOYER HAS PREVIOUSLY VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (A)
THROUGH (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER MAY BE ORDERED BY THE
COMMISSIONER TO:
(1) PAY RESTITUTION FOR ECONOMIC DAMAGES SUFFERED BY AN
EMPLOYEE AS A RESULT OF THE EMPLOYER’S FAILURE TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY THE
EMPLOYEE; AND
(2) COME INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER RESTITUTION OR BENEFIT TO WHICH AN
EMPLOYEE MAY BE ENTITLED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, ONE–THIRD OF THE AMOUNT
OF A CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A KNOWING VIOLATION
SHALL BE PAYABLE DIRECTLY TO THE AFFECTED EMPLOYEE.
3–910.
(A) IF, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT
A PERSON HAS VIOLATED OR FAILED TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ISSUE A CITATION WITH REASONABLE
PROMPTNESS.

HOUSE BILL 1096 21
(B) EACH CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) BE IN WRITING;
(2) IDENTIFY EACH PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE VIOLATED THIS
SUBTITLE AS A RESPONDENT TO THE CITATION;
(3) DESCRIBE, WITH PARTICULARITY, THE NATURE OF THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION;
(4) REFERENCE THE PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE OR REGULATION
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE PERSON IS ALLEGED TO HAVE
VIOLATED;
(5) STATE THE CIVIL PENALTY, IF ANY, THE COMMISSIONER
PROPOSES TO ASSESS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(6) STATE THE AMOUNT OF RESTITUTION, IF ANY, ORDERED BY THE
COMMISSIONER TO BE PAID TO AN EMPLOYEE UNDER § 3–909(E) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(7) STATE ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY TO COME INTO COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE AND SET A REASONABLE PERIOD FOR THE RESPONDENT TO
TAKE CORRECTIVE ACTION;
(8) NOTIFY THE RESPONDENT THAT, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT
OF THE CITATION, THE RESPONDENT MAY REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING
ON THE CITATION AND PENALTY AND THAT THE HEARING WILL BE CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
AND
(9) NOTIFY THE RESPONDENT THAT IF A HEARING IS NOT REQUESTED
WITHIN 30 DAYS OF MAILING THE CITATION, THE CITATION BECOMES A FINAL
ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL SEND A CITATION ISSUED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BY CERTIFIED AND FIRST–CLASS MAIL.
3–911.
(A) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSIONER MAILS A CITATION ISSUED
UNDER § 3–910(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE RESPONDENT MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN

HOUSE BILL 1096
REQUEST FOR A HEARING ON THE CITATION AND PROPOSED PENALTY AND
RESTITUTION, IF ANY.
(B) THE CITATION AND PROPOSED PENALTY AND RESTITUTION WILL BE
CONVERTED TO A FINAL ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER IF AN ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARING IS NOT REQUESTED BY THE RESPONDENT WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
RECEIPT OF THE CITATION.
(C) IF THE RESPONDENT REQUESTS A HEARING, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL DELEGATE TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS THE AUTHORITY
TO HOLD A HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D) AN ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL ISSUE FINDINGS OF FACT,
CONCLUSIONS OF LAW, AND A FINAL ORDER AFFIRMING, MODIFYING, OR VACATING
ALL OR PART OF THE CITATION AND ANY PROPOSED PENALTY OR RESTITUTION.
(E) THE COMMISSIONER HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF, BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, TO SHOW THAT:
(1) THE RESPONDENT HAS VIOLATED THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ANY PROPOSED PENALTY, RESTITUTION, AND ORDER FOR
COMPLIANCE IS APPROPRIATE.
(F) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF A FINAL ORDER UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A RESPONDENT FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) PAY ANY ASSESSED PENALTIES TO THE COMMISSIONER;
(2) PAY ANY ORDERED RESTITUTION TO OR ON BEHALF OF AN
EMPLOYEE WHOM THE RESPONDENT FAILED TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY; AND
(3) TAKE ALL OTHER ACTIONS SPECIFIED AS NECESSARY TO COME
INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) A PARTY AGGRIEVED BY A FINAL ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER
UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION MAY SEEK JUDICIAL REVIEW AND APPEAL
UNDER §§ 10–222 AND 10–223 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1096 23
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
FINAL ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER IS STAYED UNTIL THE TIME FOR SEEKING
JUDICIAL REVIEW EXPIRES.
(II) IF A TIMELY APPEAL IS FILED, THE ORDER IS STAYED UNTIL
FINAL DISPOSITION BY THE COURT.
(3) THE COMMISSIONER MAY SEEK JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT OF A
FINAL ORDER.
(H) A FINAL ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT
AGAINST A SUCCESSOR OF THE PERSON AGAINST WHICH THE FINAL ORDER WAS
ISSUED.
(I) A PREVIOUS FINAL ORDER FINDING A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE BY
AN EMPLOYER SHALL ESTABLISH THAT THE EMPLOYER’S OR SUCCESSOR’S
SUBSEQUENT VIOLATIONS WERE COMMITTED KNOWINGLY.
(J) THE REMEDIES INCLUDED IN A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN
ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT REGARDING THE FAILURE OF AN EMPLOYER TO PROPERLY
CLASSIFY AN INDIVIDUAL AS AN EMPLOYEE IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDY
AVAILABLE TO THE EMPLOYEE FOR A VIOLATION OF ANOTHER STATE LAW,
INCLUDING THE MARYLAND WAGE AND HOUR LAW, TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, OR TITLE 18 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THAT RESULTED FROM THE
MISCLASSIFICATION.
3–912.
(a) As authorized by State and federal law, units within the Maryland
Department of Labor and the Department of Budget and Management, the Secretary of
State, the Comptroller, the Maryland Insurance Administration, THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, and [other State agencies] THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION shall cooperate and share information concerning any
suspected failure to properly classify [an individual] A WORKER as an employee.
(b) [On a showing by clear and convincing evidence that a violation of § 3–904 of
this subtitle has occurred and as authorized by federal and State law, the] THE
Commissioner shall refer [any complaint that alleges] a SUSPECTED violation of § 13–1007
or § 13–1024 of the Tax – General Article to the:
(1) Comptroller;
(2) State’s Attorney with jurisdiction over the alleged violation;

HOUSE BILL 1096
(3) U.S. Department of Justice;
(4) U.S. Department of Labor; and
(5) U.S. Department of the Treasury.
(C) (1) EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DISSEMINATE ALL FINAL
ORDERS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO EACH AGENCY LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AN AGENCY LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
MAY NOT ISSUE OR RENEW A LICENSE TO A RESPONDENT IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE UNTIL THE RESPONDENT COMES INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THE FINAL
ORDER.
(3) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR ADVISING
THE AGENCIES LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION OF WHEN A
RESPONDENT COMES INTO COMPLIANCE WITH A FINAL ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
3–913.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an [individual]
EMPLOYEE who has not been properly classified as an employee may bring a civil action
[for economic damages] against the employer for any violation of this subtitle.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
AN EMPLOYER FAILS TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY 10 OR MORE EMPLOYEES RESULTING
IN ECONOMIC DAMAGES TOTALING $25,000 OR MORE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST THE EMPLOYER ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEES
ALLEGED TO HAVE BEEN IMPROPERLY CLASSIFIED FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) An [individual] EMPLOYEE OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL may not
bring a civil action [under this section if] ON THE SAME FACTS AND ISSUES ADDRESSED
BY a final order of [an administrative unit or of a court has been issued under § 3–906 of]
THE COMMISSIONER ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH this subtitle.
(4) (I) ON THE FILING OF AN ACTION BY AN EMPLOYEE OR THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION CONCERNING A MATTER UNDER
INVESTIGATION OR SUBJECT TO ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS BY THE
COMMISSIONER, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1096 25
1. STAY THE INVESTIGATION OR ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEEDING UNTIL THE COURT ACTION IS RESOLVED; AND
2. NOTIFY THE PARTIES OF THE RESOLUTION.
(II) ON RESOLUTION OF THE COURT ACTION, THE
COMMISSIONER MAY RESUME THE INVESTIGATION OR ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEEDINGS IF NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE, TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION
THE FINDINGS AND OUTCOMES OF THE COURT ACTION.
(b) An action filed under this section shall be filed within 3 years after the date
[the cause of action accrues] ON WHICH THE MISCLASSIFIED WORKER LAST
PERFORMED WORK FOR THE ALLEGED EMPLOYER.
(c) If the court determines that an [individual] EMPLOYEE or class of
[individuals] EMPLOYEES is entitled to judgment in an action against an employer filed in
accordance with this section, the court may award each [individual] EMPLOYEE:
(1) [any damages to which the individual may be entitled under subsection
(a) of this section] ECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(2) an additional amount up to three times the amount of any [such]
ECONOMIC damages, if the employer knowingly failed to properly classify the [individual]
EMPLOYEE;
(3) reasonable counsel fees and other costs of the action; and
(4) any other appropriate relief.
(D) IF A FINAL ORDER OF THE COURT FINDS THAT AN EMPLOYER HAS
FAILED TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN EMPLOYEE IN A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL NOTIFY THE AGENCIES
LISTED IN § 3–912(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) BEFORE INITIATING AN ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION.
3–914.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, REGISTRATION,

HOUSE BILL 1096
PERMIT, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION THAT:
(I) IS ISSUED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) IS SUBJECT TO SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, FORFEITURE,
OR TERMINATION BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(III) IS NECESSARY FOR A PERSON TO PRACTICE OR ENGAGE IN
A PARTICULAR BUSINESS, OCCUPATION, OR PROFESSION.
(3) “LICENSEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYER HOLDING A VALID LICENSE.
(4) (I) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A UNIT OF THE DIVISION
OF OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(II) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” INCLUDES:
1. THE ELEVATOR SAFETY REVIEW BOARD;
2. THE MARYLAND HOME IMPROVEMENT COMMISSION;
3. THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICIANS;
4. THE STATE BOARD OF HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, AND REFRIGERATION CONTRACTORS;
5. THE STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING;
6. THE MARYLAND BOARD OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY;
AND
7. THE MARYLAND BOARD OF INDIVIDUAL TAX
PREPARERS.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
AUTHORITY WHEN A LICENSEE IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF § 3–904 OF THIS
SUBTITLE BY A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT AND:
(I) HAS NOT PAID ALL PENALTIES ASSESSED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE FINAL ORDER OF

HOUSE BILL 1096 27
A COURT OR ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT, HAS FAILED TO COMPLY WITH A FINAL ORDER
ISSUED UNDER § 3–907 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR FAILING TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN
EMPLOYEE.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
AUTHORITY WHEN A LICENSEE IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF § 3–904 OR § 3–916 OF
THIS SUBTITLE BY A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY RECEIVES A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE OF
THE LICENSEE.
(D) (1) BEFORE SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A LICENSE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SEND WRITTEN
NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED ACTION TO THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS SUBJECT
TO SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION, INCLUDING NOTICE OF THE LICENSEE’S RIGHT TO
CONTEST THE IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS TO BE SUSPENDED OR
REVOKED.
(2) (I) A LICENSEE MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) AT A HEARING INITIATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE ISSUE SHALL BE LIMITED TO WHETHER THE COMMISSIONER
HAS MISTAKEN THE IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE HAS BEEN
SUSPENDED OR REVOKED.
(E) (1) A LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE THAT
HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
BASED ON A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION
UNTIL THE COMMISSIONER PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY
WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSIONER FIRST RECEIVES:
(I) A COURT ORDER TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE; OR
(II) WITH RESPECT TO A LICENSEE WHO IS SUBJECT TO A FINAL
ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–904 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, NOTICE THAT THE LICENSEE HAS COMPLIED WITH THE ORDER IN

HOUSE BILL 1096
FULL.
(3) A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL REINSTATE IMMEDIATELY A
LICENSE THAT WAS SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION IF:
(I) NOTIFIED BY THE COMMISSIONER THAT THE LICENSE
SHOULD BE REINSTATED; AND
(II) THE LICENSEE OTHERWISE QUALIFIES FOR THE LICENSE.
(4) WITH RESPECT TO A LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR
REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON A NOTIFICATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY
REINSTATE THE LICENSE ONLY IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE LICENSE HAS BEEN REVOKED OR
SUSPENDED SUBMITS A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) THE LICENSING AUTHORITY HOLDS A HEARING ON THE
REQUEST;
(III) THE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF ITS MEMBERS, DETERMINES THAT ANY CONDITIONS OF THE
SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION HAVE BEEN FULFILLED AND VOTES TO REINSTATE
THE LICENSE; AND
(IV) THE INDIVIDUAL PAYS TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY A
REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(F) (1) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
BE IMPOSED IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTIONS TAKEN IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE IN EFFECT AGAINST:
(I) A SUCCESSOR CORPORATION OR BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
1. HAS ONE OR MORE OF THE SAME PRINCIPALS OR
OFFICERS AS THE LICENSEE AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN,
UNLESS THE PRINCIPAL OR OFFICER DID NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF
REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH

HOUSE BILL 1096 29
THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN; AND
2. IS ENGAGED IN OR INTENDS TO ENGAGE IN THE SAME
OR EQUIVALENT TRADE OR ACTIVITY; AND
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSEE WHO WAS AN OFFICER, A
DIRECTOR, A CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, A PARTNER, OR A MANAGER OF THE
EMPLOYER AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN UNLESS THE
OFFICER, DIRECTOR, CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER, OR MANAGER DID
NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN
OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN.
3–915.
(a) [Where] IF, after AN investigation, the Commissioner issues a citation for a
knowing violation of this subtitle [or regulations adopted under this subtitle] by an
employer engaged in work on a contract with a public body, the Commissioner shall
promptly notify the public body AND THE GENERAL CONTRACTOR.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
16–203.
(a) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State if the
person, an officer, partner, controlling stockholder or principal of that person, or any other
person substantially involved in that person’s contracting activities has:
(9) been found to have REPEATEDLY, willfully, or knowingly violated Title
17, Subtitle 2 or Title 18 of this article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made in ACCORDANCE WITH A FINAL
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER OR a contested case under the Administrative Procedure Act;
and
2. the finding MADE IN A CONTESTED CASE was not
overturned on judicial review;
(10) been found to have REPEATEDLY, willfully, or knowingly violated Title
3, Subtitle 3, Subtitle 4, [or] Subtitle 5, OR SUBTITLE 9 or Title 5 of the Labor and
Employment Article if:

HOUSE BILL 1096
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made in ACCORDANCE WITH A FINAL
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER OR a contested case under the Administrative Procedure Act;
and
2. THE FINDING WAS MADE IN A CONTESTED CASE, the
finding was not overturned on judicial review;
17–224.
(a) (1) If an employee under a public work contract is paid less than the
prevailing wage rate for that employee’s classification for the work performed, the employee
may file a complaint with the Commissioner.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a complaint filed under
this section shall be subject to the provisions of § 17–221 of this subtitle.
(3) If the Commissioner’s investigation determines that the employer
violated provisions of this subtitle, the Commissioner shall try to resolve the issue
informally.
(4) (i) If the Commissioner is unable to resolve the matter informally,
the Commissioner [shall] MAY:
1. issue an order for a hearing in accordance with § 17–221
of this subtitle; OR
2. REFER THE MATTER TO THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL TO FILE A CIVIL ACTION.
(ii) If, at the conclusion of a hearing ordered under subparagraph
[(i)] (I)1 of this paragraph, the Commissioner determines that the employee is entitled to
restitution under this subtitle, the Commissioner shall issue an order in accordance with §
17–221 of this subtitle.
(iii) If an employer of an employee found to be entitled to restitution
under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph is no longer working under a contract with a
public body, the Commissioner may order that restitution be paid directly by the employer
to the employee within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the Commissioner.
(5) If an employer fails to comply with an order to pay restitution to an
employee under paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, the Commissioner or the employee

HOUSE BILL 1096 31
may bring a civil action to enforce the order in the circuit court in the county where the
employee or employer is located.
(b) (1) If an employee under a public work contract is paid less than the
prevailing wage rate for that employee’s classification for the work performed, the employee
OR THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE is entitled to sue to recover the
difference between the prevailing wage rate and the amount received by the employee.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 10 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SUE TO RECOVER THE
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE AND THE AMOUNT RECEIVED
BY EMPLOYEES IF:
(I) THERE ARE 10 OR MORE AFFECTED EMPLOYEES WHO ARE
UNDER A PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT AND ARE PAID LESS THAN THE PREVAILING
WAGE RATE FOR THE CLASSIFICATION FOR THE WORK PERFORMED; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE TOTAL WAGES UNDERPAID FOR ALL
AFFECTED EMPLOYEES IS NOT LESS THAN $25,000.
(3) A determination by the Commissioner that a contractor is required to
make restitution under subsection (a)(4) of this section does not preclude an employee from
filing an action under this subsection.
(c) (1) An action under this section is considered to be a suit for wages.
(2) A judgment in an action under this section shall have the same force
and effect as any other judgment for wages.
(3) An action brought under this section for a violation of this subtitle shall
be filed within 3 years from the date the affected employee knew or should have known of
the violation.
(d) (1) The failure of an employee to protest orally or in writing the payment
of a wage that is less than the prevailing wage rate is not a bar to recovery in an action
under this section.
(2) A contract or other written document in which an employee states that
the employee shall be paid less than the amount required by this subtitle does not bar the
recovery of any remedy required under this subtitle.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the court in an
action filed under this section finds that an employer paid an employee less than the
requisite prevailing wage, the court shall award the affected employee the difference
between the wage actually paid and the prevailing wage at the time that the services were
rendered.

HOUSE BILL 1096
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, unpaid fringe
benefit contributions owed for an employee in accordance with this section shall be paid to
the appropriate benefit fund, plan, or program.
(ii) In the absence of an appropriate benefit fund, plan, or program,
the amount owed for fringe benefits for an employee shall be paid directly to the employee.
(3) The court may order the payment of double damages or treble damages
under this section if the court finds that the employer withheld wages or fringe benefits
willfully and knowingly or with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the employer’s
obligations under this subtitle.
(4) IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPHS (1) THROUGH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL
BE ENTITLED TO AN AWARD OF LIQUIDATED DAMAGES AS PROVIDED IN § 17–222 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) In an action under this section, the court shall award a prevailing
plaintiff reasonable counsel fees and costs.
[(5)] (6) If the court finds that an employee submitted a false or
fraudulent claim in an action under this section, the court may order the employee to pay
the employer reasonable counsel fees and costs.
[(6)] (7) The contractor and subcontractor shall be jointly and severally
liable for any violation of the subcontractor’s obligations under this section.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an action filed in accordance
with this section may be brought by:
(I) one or more employees on behalf of:
1. that employee or group of employees; and [on behalf of]
2. other employees similarly situated; OR
(II) THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF:
1. ONE OR MORE EMPLOYEES; OR
2. ONE OR MORE EMPLOYEES AND OTHER EMPLOYEES
SIMILARLY SITUATED.

HOUSE BILL 1096 33
(2) An employee may not be a party plaintiff to an action brought under
this section unless that employee files written consent with the court in which the action is
brought to become a party to the action.
(g) BEFORE INITIATING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 6,
SUBTITLE 10 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(H) (1) A person found to have made a false or fraudulent representation or
omission known to be false or made with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for its
truth or falsity regarding a material fact in connection with any prevailing wage payroll
record required by § 17–220 of this subtitle is liable for a civil penalty of $1,000 for each
falsified record.
(2) The penalty shall be recoverable in a civil action filed in accordance
with this section and paid to the State General Fund.
[(h)] (I) (1) An employer may not discharge, threaten, or otherwise retaliate
or discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms and conditions
of employment because that employee or an organization or other person acting on behalf
of that employee:
[(1)] (I) reports or makes a complaint under this subtitle or otherwise
asserts the worker’s rights under this section; or
[(2)] (II) participates in any investigation, hearing, or inquiry held by the
Commissioner under § 17–221 of this subtitle.
(2) IF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION IS FOUND AFTER A HEARING
UNDER § 17–221 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ORDER THAT THE
EMPLOYER:
(I) REINSTATE THE EMPLOYEE OR PROVIDE THE EMPLOYEE
RESTITUTION, AS APPROPRIATE; AND
(II) PAY THE EMPLOYEE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THREE TIMES
THE AMOUNT OF BACK WAGES AND FRINGE BENEFITS CALCULATED FROM THE DATE
OF THE VIOLATION.
[(i)] (J) (1) A contractor or subcontractor may not retaliate or discriminate
against an employee in violation of this section.
(2) If a contractor or subcontractor retaliates or discriminates against an
employee in violation of this section, the affected employee OR THE COMMISSIONER ON

HOUSE BILL 1096
BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE may file an action in any court of competent jurisdiction
within 3 years from the employee’s knowledge of the action.
(3) If the court finds in favor of the employee in an action brought under
this subsection, the court shall order that the contractor or subcontractor:
(i) reinstate the employee or provide the employee restitution, as
appropriate;
(ii) pay the employee an amount equal to three times the amount of
back wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the violation; and
(iii) pay reasonable counsel fees and other costs.
18–109.
(a) (1) If an employee was paid less than the wage rate required under this
title the employee OR THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE AND OTHER
EMPLOYEES SIMILARLY SITUATED is entitled to sue to recover the amount of the
difference between the wage rate required under this title and the amount received by the
employee.
(2) A determination by the Commissioner that an employer is required to
make restitution does not preclude an employee from filing an action under this section.
(3) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECOVER LIQUIDATED
DAMAGES AS PROVIDED IN § 18–108 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) (1) An action under this section is considered to be a suit for wages.
(2) A judgment in an action under this section shall have the same force
and effect as any other judgment for wages.
(c) The failure of an employee to protest orally or in writing the payment of a
wage that is less than the wage rate required under this title is not a bar to recovery in an
action under this section.
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 10. WORKER PROTECTION UNIT.
6–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1096 35
(B) (1) “ECONOMIC DAMAGES” MEANS ANY FINANCIAL LOSS INCURRED
BY A WORKER AS A RESULT OF RETALIATION BY A PERSON IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) “ECONOMIC DAMAGES” INCLUDES:
(I) UNPAID WAGES; AND
(II) LOST BENEFITS.
(C) “EMPLOYER” MEANS ANY PERSON, OR A SUCCESSOR OF THE PERSON,
EMPLOYING ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
(D) “SUCCESSOR” MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT ACQUIRES, THROUGH ANY
FORM OF TRANSACTION, THE BUSINESS OPERATIONS, ASSETS, WORKFORCE OR
OTHER SIGNIFICANT ELEMENTS OF ANOTHER EMPLOYER, AND CONTINUES TO
OPERATE THE BUSINESS IN ESSENTIALLY THE SAME MANNER AS THE PREVIOUS
EMPLOYER.
(E) “UNIT” MEANS THE WORKER PROTECTION UNIT.
(F) “WORKER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL PERFORMING SERVICES FOR
REMUNERATION, INCLUDING AN EMPLOYEE AND INDIVIDUAL CLASSIFIED OR
ALLEGED TO BE INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS, REGARDLESS OF THE LEGAL
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
(G) “WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAWS” MEANS THE STATUTES AND REGULATIONS
DESIGNED TO SAFEGUARD THE RIGHTS OF WORKERS, INCLUDING:
(1) TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(2) THE MARYLAND WAGE AND HOUR LAW;
(3) TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE;
(4) THE MARYLAND WAGE PAYMENT AND COLLECTION LAW; AND
(5) ANY OTHER LAW THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS EMPOWERED
TO USE TO PROTECT WORKERS’ RIGHTS.
6–1002.

HOUSE BILL 1096
(A) THERE IS A WORKER PROTECTION UNIT IN THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE UNIT IS TO PROTECT THE RIGHTS OF WORKERS
WITHIN THE STATE, INCLUDING ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH ANY WORKERS’
RIGHTS LAWS BY INVESTIGATING AND PROSECUTING VIOLATIONS OF THE WORKERS’
RIGHTS LAWS.
6–1003.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO TAKE AWAY OR LIMIT THE
POWERS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
6–1004.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION AGAINST AN EMPLOYER OR OTHER PERSON VIOLATING
A WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAW FOR RESTITUTION OR FOR INJUNCTIVE, COMPENSATORY,
PUNITIVE, OR OTHER AUTHORIZED RELIEF FOR A WORKER, AN EMPLOYEE, OR THE
PUBLIC AT LARGE.
6–1005.
(A) THE UNIT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A FULL–TIME CHIEF COUNSEL; AND
(2) STAFF, INCLUDING ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL,
INVESTIGATORS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND ANY OTHER PERSONNEL APPOINTED BY
AND AT THE DISCRETION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) SALARIES OF THE CHIEF COUNSEL AND STAFF AND EXPENSES FOR
RENT, TRAVEL, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, AND GENERAL OPERATING EXPENSES
NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE UNIT SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL SET MINIMUM SALARIES,
QUALIFICATIONS, AND STANDARDS OF TRAINING AND EXPERIENCE FOR POSITIONS
WITHIN THE UNIT.
6–1006.

HOUSE BILL 1096 37
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
6–1007.
(A) ON THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S OWN INITIATIVE OR IN RESPONSE TO A
COMPLAINT, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE AS NECESSARY TO
DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH THE WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAWS.
(B) (1) IN CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY:
(I) ENTER AND INSPECT A PERSON’S PLACE OF BUSINESS OR
PLACE OF WORK TO:
1. OBSERVE WORK BEING PERFORMED; AND
2. EXAMINE AND COPY:
A. RECORDS THAT A PERSON IS REQUIRED TO KEEP IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 3 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE OR TITLE
17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
B. BOOKS, REGISTERS, PAYROLL RECORDS, RECORDS OF
WAGE WITHHOLDINGS, RECORDS OF WORK ACTIVITY AND HOURS OF WORK, AND
RECORDS OR INDICIA OF THE EMPLOYMENT STATUS OF WORKERS PERFORMING
WORK FOR THE PERSON; OR
C. ANY OTHER RECORDS RELATING TO COMPLIANCE
WITH THE WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAWS OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THE
WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAWS;
(II) REQUIRE A PERSON TO PRODUCE, WITHIN 15 CALENDAR
DAYS, A TRUE AND CORRECT COPY OF AN ITEM DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH;
(III) DETERMINE THE IDENTITY AND ACTIVITIES OF ANY
WORKER RECEIVING REMUNERATION FROM A PERSON; AND
(IV) CONDUCT CONFIDENTIAL INTERVIEWS AND OBTAIN ORAL
OR WRITTEN STATEMENTS FROM A WORKER RELATING TO INFORMATION
CONCERNING THE REMUNERATION OF WORKERS AND THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF
THE SERVICES PERFORMED.

HOUSE BILL 1096
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY CONDUCT THE ACTIVITIES
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT:
(I) A LOCATION WHERE WORKERS ARE ENGAGED TO PERFORM
WORK FOR ANY PERSON; AND
(II) ANY OTHER LOCATION WHERE THE RECORDS DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE MAINTAINED BY A PERSON OR AN
AGENT OF THE PERSON.
(C) AT THE DISCRETION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE UNIT MAY
REFER A MATTER TO A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY OR UNIT.
6–1008.
(A) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS DENIED ACCESS TO A PLACE OF WORK
OR PLACE OF BUSINESS AFTER MAKING A PROPER REQUEST TO THE OWNER,
LESSEE, EMPLOYER, OR OTHER PERSON IN CHARGE OF ACCESS TO THE PLACE OF
BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY APPLY TO THE
DISTRICT COURT FOR AN ADMINISTRATIVE SEARCH WARRANT UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(B) EACH APPLICATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) STATE THE NATURE, PURPOSE, AND SCOPE OF THE INSPECTION;
AND
(2) SHOW THAT:
(I) THE APPLICANT IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO INSPECT THE
PLACE OF BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK TO WHICH ACCESS WAS DENIED;
(II) REQUESTED ACCESS WAS AT A REASONABLE TIME;
(III) ACCESS WAS DENIED; AND
(IV) THE INSPECTION IS FOR A PURPOSE RELATED TO THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) ON A SHOWING OF PROBABLE CAUSE, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
ISSUE THE ADMINISTRATIVE SEARCH WARRANT AUTHORIZING THE ATTORNEY

HOUSE BILL 1096 39
GENERAL OR AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE TO ENTER AND INSPECT THE PLACE
OF BUSINESS OR PLACE OF WORK, EXAMINE AND COPY RECORDS, AND TAKE OTHER
NECESSARY ACTIONS TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE.
6–1009.
(A) TO CARRY OUT A DUTY OR EXERCISE A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY ADMINISTER OATHS AND QUESTION WITNESSES ON RECORD AND
UNDER OATH.
(B) (1) TO ADMINISTER OR ENFORCE THIS TITLE, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR THE
ATTENDANCE OF A WITNESS TO TESTIFY OR THE PRODUCTION OF BOOKS,
DOCUMENTS, PAPERS, AND RECORDS.
(2) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR FAILS TO TESTIFY ON A MATTER ON WHICH
THE PERSON LAWFULLY MAY BE INTERROGATED, ON A COMPLAINT FILED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PERSON
RESIDES OR IS PRESENT MAY PASS AN ORDER DIRECTING COMPLIANCE WITH THE
SUBPOENA OR COMPELLING TESTIMONY.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT BE EXCUSED FROM:
(1) ATTENDING AND TESTIFYING; OR
(2) PRODUCING A DOCUMENT OR RECORD BEFORE THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR IN A PROCEEDING INITIATED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON THE
GROUNDS THAT THE TESTIMONY OR EVIDENCE MAY INCRIMINATE THE PERSON OR
SUBJECT THE PERSON TO A PENALTY OR FORFEITURE.
(D) EXCEPT IN CASES OF PERJURY OR CONTEMPT, TESTIMONY OR
EVIDENCE OBTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
USED TO CRIMINALLY PROSECUTE THE INDIVIDUAL FOR THE SPECIFIC SUBJECT
THEY WERE COMPELLED TO TESTIFY OR PRODUCE EVIDENCE ABOUT.
6–1010.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RETALIATION” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 1096
(1) ADVERSE ACTIONS AFFECTING THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
WORK OR EMPLOYMENT, SUCH AS TERMINATION, DEMOTION, REASSIGNMENT,
RELOCATION, CHANGE OF SCHEDULE, OR SUSPENSION;
(2) HARASSMENT OR INTIMIDATION IN THE WORKPLACE; AND
(3) AN ACTION THAT WOULD DISCOURAGE A WORKER FROM
PARTICIPATING IN AN INVESTIGATION OR A PROCEEDING UNDER THIS TITLE OR
OTHERWISE EXERCISE ANY RIGHT AFFORDED BY THIS TITLE.
(B) AN EMPLOYER OR ANOTHER PERSON MAY NOT DISCHARGE, DEMOTE,
HARASS, OR OTHERWISE RETALIATE AGAINST A WORKER WHO:
(1) REPORTS OR MAKES A COMPLAINT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
OF A VIOLATION OF WORKERS’ RIGHTS LAWS;
(2) PARTICIPATES IN AN INVESTIGATION OR PROCEEDING UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) OTHERWISE EXERCISES ANY RIGHT AFFORDED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A WORKER WHO BELIEVES THAT THE WORKER HAS BEEN
RETALIATED AGAINST IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY FILE
A COMPLAINT WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE A COMPLAINT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1007 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY FILE AN ACTION ON BEHALF OF ANY
WORKER FOUND BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO HAVE BEEN RETALIATED AGAINST
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IN ANY COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
WITHIN 3 YEARS FROM THE LAST INSTANCE OF RETALIATION.
(E) IF THE COURT FINDS IN FAVOR OF THE WORKER IN AN ACTION BROUGHT
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL ORDER, AS
APPROPRIATE, THAT THE EMPLOYER OR OTHER PERSON:
(1) REINSTATE THE WORKER OR PROVIDE THE WORKER
RESTITUTION; AND
(2) PAY:
(I) ECONOMIC DAMAGES;

HOUSE BILL 1096 41
(II) AN AMOUNT TO THE WORKER THAT IS EQUAL TO THREE
TIMES THE AMOUNT OF ECONOMIC DAMAGES CALCULATED FROM THE DATE OF THE
VIOLATION;
(III) COMPENSATORY AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES; OR
(IV) REASONABLE COUNSEL FEES AND OTHER COSTS TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.